fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Équipements pour sports canins: Cadre en A; Tunnels d’agilité; Promenades et rampes pour chiens; Barres de saut; Tables de pause; Poteaux; Planches à bascule; Sauts de pneus
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Equipos para el ejercicio de mascotas: Empalizadas; Túneles de agilidad; Paseos para perros y rampas; Barras de salto; Cajas de pausa; Postes; Balancines; Anillos para saltos
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 宠物敏捷训练器材: A 型框架; 敏捷训练隧道; 狗走道和坡道; 跳杆; 暂停台; 训练杆; 跷跷板; 轮胎跳台
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Agility-Ausrüstung: A-Wände; Agility-Tunnel; Stege und Rampen für Hunde; Hürden; Pausentische; Stangen; Wippen; Springreifen
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Dụng cụ thể thao cho thú cưng: Khung chữ A; Đường hầm vận động; Đường dẫn chó đi dạo & đường dốc; Thanh chướng ngại vật; Bệ đứng; Cọc chơi; Ván bập bênh; Lốp xe chướng ngại vật
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Equipamento de ginástica para animais domésticos: Estruturas em A; Túneis de agilidade; Passeios e rampas para cães; Barras de salto; Mesas de pausa; Hastes; Tábuas de oscilação; Saltos de pneus
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Behendigheidsartikelen voor huisdieren: A-frames; Behendigheidstunnels; Hondenwandelingen en -hellingen; Springbalken; Pauzetafels; Palen; Teeterboards; Bandensprongen
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Pet Agility Equipment: A-Frames; Agility Tunnels; Dog Walks & Ramps; Jump Bars; Pause Tables; Poles; Teeter Boards; Tire Jumps
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Equipamento de agilidade para peixes: Equipamentos tipo cavalete; Túneis de agilidade; Passeios e rampas para cães; Barreiras de salto; Mesas de pausa; Varas para animais; Balancés para animais; Pneus de salto
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Háziállatmozgékonyság-felszerelés: A-keretek; Mozgékonysági alagutak; Kutyasétányok és -rámpák; Ugrórudak; Szünetasztalok; Oszlopok; Hintatáblák; Gumiabroncsugrók
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Udstyr til agilitytræning af kæledyr: A-rammer; Agility-tunneler; Hunderamper; Hopbarer; Pauseborde; Pæle; Vippebrætter; Dækspring
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Agilityutstyr for husdyr: A-Frames; Agility-tunneler; Hundeturer og -ramper; Hoppstenger; Pausebord; Stenger; Vippbrett; Dekkhopp
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Εξοπλισμός ευκινησίας για κατοικίδια ζώα: Πλαίσια τύπου Α; Τούνελ ευκινησίας για εκπαίδευση κατοικίδιων ζώων; Διαδρομές & ράμπες για σκύλους; Μπάρες άλματος; Τραπέζια διαλείμματος; Πόλοι; Σανίδες ισορροπίας; Άλματα με στεφάνια
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Аджилити оборудване за домашни любимци: А-образна естакада; Аджилити тунели; Пътеки и рампи за преминаване; Лостове за прескачане; Маси за почивка; Пилони; Везни за преминаване; Скокове на гуми
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > ペット用アジリティトレーニング用品: Aフレーム; アジリティ トンネル; 犬の散歩・スロープ; ジャンプバー; ポーズテーブル; ポール; ティーターボード; タイヤジャンプ
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Agility vybavenie pre domácich miláčikov: A-rámy; Agility tunely; Rampy pre psov; Tyče na preskakovanie; Oddychové stoly; Stĺpy; Balančné dosky; Skoky cez koleso
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Oprema za agilnost hišnih ljubljenčkov: Rampe za agility; Agility tuneli; Sprehajalne poti in rampe za pse; Palice za preskoke; Mize za premor; Palice; Ravnotežne deske; Pnevmatike za preskoke
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Vybavení pro výcvik: A-stojany; Agility tunely; Rampy a schůdky pro psy; Agility překážky; Agility stoly; Tyče; Houpačky pro agility; Proskakovací agility překážky
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Terbiye Ekipmanları: A-Çerçeve; Çeviklik Tünelleri; Köpek Yürüyüşleri ve Rampaları; Atlama Çubukları; Durma Masaları; Direkler; Tahterevalli Tahtaları; Lastik Atlamaları
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikin agilitytarvikkeet: A-telineet; Agilitytunnelit; Koiran reitit ja rampit; Hyppyesteet; Pysähtymispöydät; Paalut; Keinulaudat; Rengashyppyesteet
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Sprzęt do agility dla zwierząt: Przeszkody w kształcie litery A; Tunele agility; Konstrukcje i rampy dla psów; Drążki do skakania; Stoły do agility; Tyczki do agility; Huśtawki do agility; Koła do skakania
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Echipament de agilitate pentru animale de companie: Cadre în formă de A; Tuneluri pentru agilitate; Echipamente pentru plimbări și rampe pentru câini; Bare pentru sărituri; Mese pentru pauză; Stâlpi; Balansoar; Circuit pentru sărituri prin cauciucuri
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์ฝึกความคล่องแคล่วของสัตว์เลี้ยง: โครงรูปตัว A; อุโมงค์ฝึกความคล่องตัว; ทางเดินและทางลาดสำหรับสุนัข; คานกระโดด; โต๊ะพัก; เสา; กระดานหก; ยางสำหรับกระโดด
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 운동 시설: A프레임; 어질리티 터널; 반려견용 산책/경사대; 점프용 막대; 어질리티용 테이블; 폴; 시소 보드; 타이어 점프
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Agilityutrustning för husdjur: A-frames; Agility-tunnlar; Hundbanor och ramper; Hoppstänger; Pausbord; Pålar; Vippbrädor; Däckhopp
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Attrezzi per addestramento animali: Cornici ad A; Tunnel per agility; Passeggiate e rampe per cani; Barre per saltare; Tabelle di pausa; Poli; Tavole basculanti; Salti di pneumatici
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Oprema za agilnost kućnih ljubimaca: Stalci u obliku slova A; Tuneli za agilnost; Staze za pse za hodanje i trčanje; Prečke za skok; Stolovi za stajanje; Stupovi; Daske za klackanje; Gume za preskakanje
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Priemonės naminių gyvūnų vikrumui ugdyti: A formos rėmai; Vikrumo tuneliai; Vaikščiojimo sijos ir rampos šunims; Kliūtys šuoliams; Sustojimo staliukai; Kartys; Persveriamos lentos; Padangos šuoliams
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Снаряды для аджилити: Горки; Туннели для аджилити; Бумы и трапы для собак; Барьеры; Столы; Слалом; Качели; Шины
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 寵物敏捷度測試設備: A 字型; 敏捷隧道; 狗用走道和坡道; 跳桿; 暫停桌; 桿子; 訓練蹺蹺板; 跳躍訓練輪胎